Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SAINT PAUL NEIGHBORHOOD NETWORK.new text end new text begin $125,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to the Saint Paul Neighborhood Network to support their work amplifying community voices through programming and education in cinematography, lighting, and editing; storytelling; documentary filmmaking; and other artistic programming. new text end